udm.aff
FLAG long
SFX N6 Y 450	# ма-и, та-осыд, со-лэн, котьма-идлэн
SFX N6 0 и [^и][^н]
SFX N6 0 ид .
SFX N6 0 из .
SFX N6 0 мы .
SFX N6 0 эз [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N6 0 ез [^дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N6 0 ты [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 ды [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 сы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 зы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 ме . #1лицо	 вин.п.
SFX N6 0 мес . 
SFX N6 0 тэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ]  #2л.
SFX N6 0 дэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵ] 
SFX N6 0 тэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ] 
SFX N6 0 дэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 сэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ] #3л.
SFX N6 0 зэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵ] 
SFX N6 0 сэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 зэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵ] 
SFX N6 0 лэн . 		#род.п.
SFX N6 0 илэн .
SFX N6 0 идлэн .
SFX N6 0 излэн .
SFX N6 0 мылэн .
SFX N6 0 тылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 дылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 сылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 зылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 лэсь . 	# разд.п.
SFX N6 0 лэсьсэ .
SFX N6 0 илэсь .
SFX N6 0 идлэсь .
SFX N6 0 излэсь .
SFX N6 0 мылэсь .
SFX N6 0 тылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 дылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 сылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 зылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 лы .		 # дат.п.
SFX N6 0 илы .
SFX N6 0 идлы .
SFX N6 0 излы .
SFX N6 0 мылы .
SFX N6 0 тылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 дылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 сылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 зылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 тэк . #лиш.п.
SFX N6 0 итэк .
SFX N6 0 идтэк .
SFX N6 0 изтэк .
SFX N6 0 мытэк .
SFX N6 0 тытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 дытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 сытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 зытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 ъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥь] #соотв.п.
SFX N6 0 я [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥь]
SFX N6 0 ия .
SFX N6 0 идъя .
SFX N6 0 изъя .
SFX N6 0 мыя .
SFX N6 0 тыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 дыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 сыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 зыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 ин . #твор.п. + местн.п. + входн.п.
SFX N6 0 иным .
SFX N6 0 инымы .
SFX N6 0 иныд .
SFX N6 0 иныды .
SFX N6 0 иныз .
SFX N6 0 инызы .	
SFX N6 0 ам [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N6 0 амы [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N6 0 ад [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N6 0 ады [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N6 0 аз [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N6 0 азы [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N6 0 ям [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N6 0 ямы [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N6 0 яд [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N6 0 яды [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N6 0 яз [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N6 0 язы [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N6 ь ям ь
SFX N6 ь ямы ь
SFX N6 ь яд ь
SFX N6 ь яды ь
SFX N6 ь яз ь
SFX N6 ь язы ь
SFX N6 0 ысь . #исходн.п.
SFX N6 0 ысьтым .
SFX N6 0 ысьтымы .
SFX N6 0 ысьтыд .
SFX N6 0 ысьтыды .
SFX N6 0 ысьтыз .
SFX N6 0 ысьтызы .
SFX N6 0 ысьсэ .
SFX N6 0 ысен . #отдал.п.
SFX N6 0 ысеным .
SFX N6 0 ысенымы .
SFX N6 0 ысеныд .
SFX N6 0 ысеныды .
SFX N6 0 ысеныз .
SFX N6 0 ысенызы .
SFX N6 0 ысез . #-ысез
SFX N6 0 тӥ . 
SFX N6 0 тӥм .
SFX N6 0 тӥмы .
SFX N6 0 тӥд .
SFX N6 0 тӥды .
SFX N6 0 тӥз .
SFX N6 0 тӥзы .
SFX N6 0 лань . #направ.п.
SFX N6 0 илань .
SFX N6 0 идлань .
SFX N6 0 излань .
SFX N6 0 мылань .
SFX N6 0 тылань [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 дылань [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 сылань [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 зылань [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N6 0 озь [^ь] #предельн.п.
SFX N6 ь ёзь [ь]
SFX N6 0 озям .
SFX N6 0 озяд .
SFX N6 0 озяз .
SFX N6 0 мыозь .
SFX N6 0 дыозь .
SFX N6 0 зыозь .
SFX N6 0 ъёс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ос [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 ёс [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсыд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсмы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсты [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёссы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 осы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осыд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осмы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осты [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 оссы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 ёсы [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсыд [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсыз [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсмы [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсты [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёссы [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # вин.п.
SFX N6 0 ъёсты [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 осыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осты [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 ёсыз [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсты [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсме [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсмес [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёстэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёстэс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёссэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёссэс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 осме [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осмес [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 остэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 остэс [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 оссэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 оссэс [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 ёсме [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсмес [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёстэ [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёстэс [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёссэ [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёссэс [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёслэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # род.п.
SFX N6 0 ослэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 ёслэн [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсыдлэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсызлэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсмылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёстылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёссылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 осылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осыдлэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осызлэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осмылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 остылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 оссылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 ёсылэн [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсыдлэн [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсызлэн [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсмылэн [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёстылэн [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёссылэн [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёслэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # разд.п.
SFX N6 0 ослэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 ёслэсь [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсыдлэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсызлэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсмылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёстылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёссылэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 осылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осыдлэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осызлэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осмылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 остылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 оссылэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 ёсылэсь [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсыдлэсь [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсызлэсь [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсмылэсь [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёстылэсь [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёссылэсь [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёслы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # дат.п.
SFX N6 0 ослы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 ёслы [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсыдлы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсызлы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсмылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёстылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёссылы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 осылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осыдлы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осызлы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осмылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 остылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 оссылы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 ёсылы [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсыдлы [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсызлы [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсмылы [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёстылы [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёссылы [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёстэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # лиш.п.
SFX N6 0 остэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 ёстэк [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсыдтэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсызтэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсмытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёстытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёссытэк [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 осытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осыдтэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осызтэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осмытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 остытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 оссытэк [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 ёсытэк [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсыдтэк [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсызтэк [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсмытэк [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёстытэк [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёссытэк [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # соотв.п.
SFX N6 0 осъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 ёсъя [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсыдъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсызъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсмыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёстыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёссыя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 осыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осыдъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осызъя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осмыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 остыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 оссыя [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 ёсыя [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсыдъя [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсызъя [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёсмыя [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёстыя [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ёссыя [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсын [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # твор.п. + местн.п.
SFX N6 0 осын [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 ёсын [ьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсыным [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # твор.п.
SFX N6 0 ъёсынымы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсыныд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсыныды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсыныз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 ъёсынызы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N6 0 осыным [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осынымы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осыныд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осыныды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осыныз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 осынызы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N6 0 ёсыным [ьъй]
